North Dakota, session 69, HB1198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 40-49-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Participate in cooperative purchasing contracts with the office of management and budget
pursuant to chapter 54 - 44.4, participate in cooperative purchasing contracts with another
state, and contract for cooperative purchases pursuant to a joint powers agreement under
chapter 54 - 40.3 .

H. B. NO. 1198 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1198.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State